Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201453-190
Premises violating
law declared common nuisances.

All places where
alcoholic liquor is sold or consumed in violation of any provision of section
53-186.01 shall be taken and held and are declared to be common
nuisances and
may be abated as such in the manner provided in the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 61, p. 409;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-361;

R.S.1943, § 53-190;

Laws 1965, c. 318, § 11, p. 901;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 26.